Washington statutes.
RCW 7.48.200

Remedies.

The remedies against a public nuisance are: Indictment or information, a civil action, or abatement. The remedy by indictment or information shall be as regulated and prescribed in this chapter. When a civil action for damage is resorted to, the practice shall conform to RCW 7.48.010 through 7.48.040.

[ 1957 c 51 s 12; Code 1881 s 1242; 1875 p 80 s 8; RRS s 9920.]